src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_PYY
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 18 y
!!€ pyy: pyy+N+Sg+Nom kind of a bird
!!€ pyytä: pyy+N+Sg+Par
!!€ pyyhyn: pyy+N+Sg+Ill
0:y   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:y   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:y   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:y   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:y   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:y   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PÄÄ
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 18 ä
!!€ pää: pää+N+Sg+Nom # head
!!€ päätä: pää+N+Sg+Par
!!€ päähän: pää+N+Sg+Ill
0:ä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KÖÖ
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 18 ö
!!€ köö: köö+N+Sg+Nom pool/billiard stick
!!€ köötä: köö+N+Sg+Par
!!€ kööhön: köö+N+Sg+Ill
0:ö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

!! !Opening diphthong stems
!! In old opening diphthong final words, the dipthong simplifies for plural
!! forms by dropping the initial vowel. For new words of this class, no
!! stem mutations happen and they are in above mentioned classes, (e.g.
!! N_ZOMBIE).

LEXICON N_TIE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 19 ie
!!€ tie: tie+N+Sg+Nom # road
!!€ tietä: tie+N+Sg+Par
!!€ teitä: tie+N+Pl+Par
0:ie  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ie  N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ie  N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:ie  N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0:e    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ie  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ie  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_VUO
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 19 uo
!!€ suo: suo+N+Sg+Nom # swamp
!!€ suota: suo+N+Sg+Par
!!€ soita: suo+N+Pl+Par
0:uo  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:uo  N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:uo  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
0:uo  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON    ;
0:o    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0:o    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:o    N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:o    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:uo  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:uo  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_YÖ
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 19 yö
!!€ työ: työ+N+Sg+Nom # work
!!€ työtä: työ+N+Sg+Par
!!€ töitä: työ+N+Pl+Par
0:yö  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:yö  N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:yö  N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:yö  N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN    ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:yö  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:yö  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

!! !Newer loan words
!! The loan words that end in long vowel, and have been modified to Finnish
!! orthography, have combination of long vowel stem’s allomorphs for e.g
!! illatives. Sometimes rules for these classes of words are vague.

LEXICON N_NUGAA
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 20 a
!!€ nugaa: nugaa+N+Sg+Nom # nougat
!!€ nugaata: nugaa+N+Sg+Par
!!€ nugaana: nugaa+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ nugaahan: nugaa+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ nugaaseen: nugaa+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ nugaissa: nugaa+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ nugaista: nugaa+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ nugaiden: nugaa+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ nugaitten: nugaa+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ nugaisiin: nugaa+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ nugaihin: nugaa+N+Pl+Ill
0:a   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN   ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PATEE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 20 e
!!€ patee: patee+N+Sg+Nom # paté
!!€ pateeta: patee+N+Sg+Par
!!€ pateena: patee+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ pateehen: patee+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ pateeseen: patee+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ pateissa: patee+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ pateista: patee+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ pateiden: patee+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ pateitten: patee+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ pateisiin: patee+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ pateihin: patee+N+Pl+Ill
0:e   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:e   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:e   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HEN   ;
0:e   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_BIDEE
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 20 e front
!!€ bidee: bidee+N+Sg+Nom # bidet
!!€ bideetä: bidee+N+Sg+Par
!!€ bideenä: bidee+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ bideehen: bidee+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ bideeseen: bidee+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ bideissä: bidee+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ bideistä: bidee+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ bideiden: bidee+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ bideitten: bidee+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ bideisiin: bidee+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ bideihin: bidee+N+Pl+Ill
0:e   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:e   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:e   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN   ;
0:e   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

!! There’s a gap in -ii final loan stems.

LEXICON N_TRIKOO
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 20 o
!!€ trikoo: trikoo+N+Sg+Nom # tights
!!€ trikoota: trikoo+N+Sg+Par
!!€ trikoona: trikoo+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ trikoissa: trikoo+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ trikoista: trikoo+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ trikooseen: trikoo+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ trikoiden: trikoo+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ trikoitten: trikoo+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ trikoihin: trikoo+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ trikoisiin: trikoo+N+Pl+Ill
0:o   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:o   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:o   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIN   ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_RAGUU
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 20 u
!!€ raguu: raguu+N+Sg+Nom # ragout
!!€ raguuta: raguu+N+Sg+Par
!!€ raguuna: raguu+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ raguussa: raguu+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ raguista: raguu+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ raguuseen: raguu+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ raguiden: raguu+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ raguiden: raguu+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ raguisiin: raguu+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ raguihin: raguu+N+Pl+Ill
0:u   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:u   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:u   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:u   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN   ;
0:u   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:u   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:u   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_FONDYY
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 20 y
!!€ fondyy: fondyy+N+Sg+Nom # fondue
!!€ fondyytä: fondyy+N+Sg+Par
!!€ fondyynä: fondyy+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ fondyyssä: fondyy+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ fondyistä: fondyy+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ fonduuseen: fondyy+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ fondyyhyn: fondyy+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ fondyiden: fondyy+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ fondyitten: fondyy+N+Pl+Gen
0:y   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:y   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:y   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:y   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN   ;
0:y   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:y   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:y   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON  N
aspiskyy+N:aspis#ky N_PYY  ;
bidee+N:bide N_BIDEE  ;
bukee+N:buke N_PATEE  ;
cree+N:cre N_BIDEE  ;
dekoltee+N:dekolte N_PATEE  ;
entree+N:entre N_BIDEE  ;
essee+N:esse N_BIDEE  ;
etätyö+N:etä#t   N_YÖ  ;
filee+N:file N_BIDEE  ;
fondyy+N:fondy N_FONDYY  ;
frotee+N:frote N_PATEE  ;
gaboninkyy+N:gaboninky N_PYY  ;
helapää+N:hela#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
hietakyy+N:hietaky N_PYY  ;
hilsesampoo+N:hilse#sampo N_TRIKOO  ;
hoitotyö+N:hoito#t   N_YÖ  ;
hynttyy+N:hyntty N_PYY  ;
hännänpää+N:hännän#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
häränfilee+N:härän#file N_BIDEE  ;
hätäpoistumistie+N:hätä#poistumis#t   N_TIE  ;
jalkatyö+N:jalka#t   N_YÖ  ;
jalkopää+N:jalkopä N_PÄÄ  ;
jamboree+N:jambore N_PATEE  ;
juustofondyy+N:juusto#fondy N_FONDYY  ;
jäätie+N:jää#t   N_TIE  ;
jöö+N:jö N_KÖÖ  ;
kabaree+N:kabare N_PATEE  ;
kaksoisvee+N:kaksois#ve N_BIDEE  ;
kalafilee+N:kala#file N_BIDEE  ;
kalanpää+N:kalan#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
kalliopyy+N:kalliopy N_PYY  ;
kanadanpyyt+N:kanadanpyy N_PYY  ;
karavaanitie+N:karavaani#t   N_TIE  ;
karpalosuo+N:karpalo#s   N_VUO  ;
kehitysyhteistyö+N:kehitys#yhteis#t   N_YÖ  ;
keidassuo+N:keidas#s   N_VUO  ;
kermatoffee+N:kerma#toffe N_PATEE  ;
kesäsää+N:kesä#sä N_PÄÄ  ;
kiertotie+N:kierto#t   N_TIE  ;
kivikkopyy+N:kivikkopy N_PYY  ;
klanipää+N:klani#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
klisee+N:klise N_BIDEE  ;
kohosuo+N:koho#s   N_VUO  ;
kolmivuorotyö+N:kolmi#vuoro#t   N_YÖ  ;
komentotie+N:komento#t   N_TIE  ;
korpisuo+N:korpi#s   N_VUO  ;
kuivasampoo+N:kuiva#sampo N_TRIKOO  ;
kultadublee+N:kulta#duble N_PATEE  ;
kumpusuo+N:kumpu#s   N_VUO  ;
kuolemansyy+N:kuoleman#sy N_PYY  ;
kusipää+N:kusi#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
kutsumustyö+N:kutsumus#t   N_YÖ  ;
kylätie+N:kylä#t   N_TIE  ;
kyynelvuo+N:kyynel#v   N_VUO  ;
kyy+N:ky N_PYY  ;
köö+N:kö N_KÖÖ  ;
lallalaa+N:lallala N_NUGAA  ;
lamee+N:lame N_PATEE  ;
laskupää+N:lasku#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
lihafondyy+N:liha#fondy N_FONDYY  ;
lisensiaatintyö+N:lisensiaatin#t   N_YÖ  ;
lumijää+N:lumi#jä N_PÄÄ  ;
luo+N:l   N_VUO  ;
lääkesampoo+N:lääke#sampo N_TRIKOO  ;
maantie+N:maan#t   N_TIE  ;
maatyö+N:maa#t   N_YÖ  ;
magneettivuo+N:magneetti#v   N_VUO  ;
maksapatee+N:maksa#pate N_PATEE  ;
menominee+N:menomine N_PATEE  ;
menyy+N:meny N_FONDYY  ;
munasampoo+N:muna#sampo N_TRIKOO  ;
mustapää+N:musta#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
myy+N:my N_PYY  ;
nahkatyö+N:nahka#t   N_YÖ  ;
nailontrikoo+N:nailon#triko N_TRIKOO  ;
nelostie+N:nelos#t   N_TIE  ;
neutronivuo+N:neutroni#v   N_VUO  ;
nugaa+N:nuga N_NUGAA  ;
nuijapää+N:nuija#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
omantunnonsyy+N:omantunnonsy N_PYY  ;
paahtofilee+N:paahto#file N_BIDEE  ;
pahvipää+N:pahvi#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
palsasuo+N:palsa#s   N_VUO  ;
panosvyö+N:panos#v   N_YÖ  ;
parfee+N:parfe N_PATEE  ;
patee+N:pate N_PATEE  ;
peltotie+N:pelto#t   N_TIE  ;
perussyy+N:perus#sy N_PYY  ;
politbyroo+N:politbyro N_TRIKOO  ;
porsaanfilee+N:porsaan#file N_BIDEE  ;
poskipää+N:poski#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
puistotie+N:puisto#t   N_TIE  ;
pumpulitrikoo+N:pumpuli#triko N_TRIKOO  ;
punontatyö+N:punonta#t   N_YÖ  ;
puuvillatrikoo+N:puu#villa#triko N_TRIKOO  ;
pyramidikyy+N:pyramidiky N_PYY  ;
päätyö+N:pää#t   N_YÖ  ;
raguu+N:ragu N_RAGUU  ;
rahkasuo+N:rahka#s   N_VUO  ;
rautatie+N:rauta#t   N_TIE  ;
referee+N:refere N_BIDEE  ;
revyy+N:revy N_FONDYY  ;
rimpisuo+N:rimpi#s   N_VUO  ;
rinnanpää+N:rinnan#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
rämesuo+N:räme#s   N_VUO  ;
sampoo+N:sampo N_TRIKOO  ;
šampoo+N:šampo N_TRIKOO  ;
santee+N:sante N_PATEE  ;
shampoo+N:shampo N_TRIKOO  ;
sillifilee+N:silli#file N_BIDEE  ;
sisävesitie+N:sisä#vesi#t   N_TIE  ;
stukkotyö+N:stukko#t   N_YÖ  ;
suksee+N:sukse N_PATEE  ;
suo+N:s   N_VUO  ;
syy+N:sy N_PYY  ;
sävytesampoo+N:sävyte#sampo N_TRIKOO  ;
takatie+N:taka#t   N_TIE  ;
tasapää+N:tasa#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
teevee+N:teeve N_BIDEE  ;
tiimityö+N:tiimi#t   N_YÖ  ;
tupee+N:tupe N_PATEE  ;
ulkofilee+N:ulko#file N_BIDEE  ;
urospyy+N:urospy N_PYY  ;
vaatturintyö+N:vaatturin#t   N_YÖ  ;
valitustie+N:valitus#t   N_TIE  ;
vauvasampoo+N:vauva#sampo N_TRIKOO  ;
vikapää+N:vika#pä N_PÄÄ  ;
virginianpyy+N:virginianpy N_PYY  ;
virkatie+N:virka#t   N_TIE  ;
voodoo+N:voodo N_TRIKOO  ;
vuo+N:v   N_VUO  ;
öljysampoo+N:öljy#sampo N_TRIKOO  ;
